Totally awesome!!
It takes 30 minutes for one ride and fits a good amount of people.
Any spot in the pod is a good view but I prefer the strip view!
I recommend going at night when the strip is lite up and the lights on the wheel are flashing!

Great time here!
Wonderful during sunset time because you get to see when the Vegas lights are off and on.
Fits 40 people and takes 30 minutes to go around.
Very structurally safe.
I'm not nervous for heights or anything but I did feel light headed up there.
Worth going on.
$24.99 during the day and $34.99 during the evening.

So COOL!!!
Glad we came down to check this out!
Been watching them build it and now I get to ride it.
The line is indoors with a couple different staging areas.
There's even a bar half way up.
Pay attention when you are boarding.
When I road it did NOT stop.
But hey there's a safety net underneath, just incase lol.
There's enough time once you get on if you change your mind and want to get off.
There's plenty of room to walk around and a couple of benches to sit.
The whole rotation takes about 30 minutes.
I have to ride it again at night.
I'll bet the view is amazing!
Be sure to view your photo on your way out.
They do green screen souvenir photo on the way up.

YELP 365 CHALLENGE 2014-(92/365) "Free Ride"  So we just happened to be "playing Tourists" at The LINQ and we passed the High Roller and inquired about their projected opening.
The gentlemen at the door mentioned that Caesar's Gaming Employees had access to ride, then asked us if we were locals.
We said "Yes we are!
" so he handed us a couple of tickets and said "Enjoy your ride!".
As you step inside, you pass through a couple staging areas where employees are constantly telling you "right this way" and "enjoy your ride!
" then you take a quick souvenir photo(to pick up after wards at the sky shop).
one area shows you a quick video and gives you a last chance to back out like a wuss if you choose to do the walk of shame.
Lastly, there's restrooms to do your business so you're not holding it for the duration of the ride(Half an hour long) For those who wanna snack and booze it up during your ride, there's a concession stand to get drinks and snacks before you board your pod.
You are lead outside to a waiting area beside the High Roller, and when its your time to enter, do so calmly, but quickly!
The wheel is constantly moving very slow, and hardly ever stops!
Its like getting on and off an escalator.
Inside, there's enough seating for about 10-12 people, and the rest of the space is standing room only, or if you wish, sit on the pod floor.
Up to 40 people fit in one pod, but during our ride, we had about 15-20 people which was better IMHO....sufficient space to sit/stand and move around freely inside the pod during the ride which also allowed for lots of pictures which I'm sure will be more limited as it opens to the public and more people are allowed in the pods.
I also feel bad for those who don't do well in claustrophobic settings.
as this ride may make one feel that way.
As the ride ends, exit the pod the same way you entered it, but on the opposite side you entered from, You are then led under the High Roller to the Sky Shop were you can pick up gifts and even your souvenir photo if you wish.
It is an awesome ride that everyone should experience at least once.
I heard that it is beautiful at night when the wheel and the strip is all lit up.
ALOHA!!!
Shaka Meter:  \uuu/  \uuu/  \uuu/  \uuu/  \uuu/  5  * I heard the admission may be $30 and the hours may be from 10 am to 2 am

One of the lucky ones!
I happened to be strolling through the recently opened Linq and discovered that the view High Roller was about to open for business, so they were giving free preview rides.
I was also lucky to happen by about 15 after they started giving away rides so I only had to wait 30 min to get on.
Over all, it's a fantastic view, especially at night and if you've not been to Vegas much you get to see a lot.
However, about 1/2 of the view is obstructed by the hotels closest to the ride.
The other 1/2 is rather nice, but you can really only see the parts of the strip where there are low rise buildings.
(I actually had a better view of the strip as I landed on my airplane)   It is a fantastic opportunity and pretty cool to be that high up.
It's a pleasant 30 min ride with plenty of room to move about the cabin despite 35 people inside.
I was waiting to see what pricing they put on it before I made a final conclusion.
$25 before 6pm, $35 after 6pm (both with advance ticket purchase) and $60 to buy and ride immediately.
Unfortunately, I don't think it's anywhere near worth that price.
Especially when you start multiplying it by multiple family members.
Will be interested to see how busy it is on a summer day...likely lots of people willing to pay that.
5 stars for it being the highest in the world  4 stars for the view  3 stars for the experience (got bored about 20 min in) 2 stars for the price 3 stars overall

Vegas local ...
Waited months for this to open Very boring not worth 40$ go to the stratosphere instead  ... My tvs didn't work windows were dirty .... Then was told "we don't give refunds"  ... F the highroller  And noooooo discount for locals ...
Least we know what caesars thinks of it's neighbors

Oh my, the view!!
This wheel, the world's tallest, is a marvel of engineering- especially at night.
If you know how to work around it, the line really isn't too bad and once you're up there, it's totally worth it!
I would definitely recommend going at night and paying the extra money.
The sparkling lights are amazing!
(And this is from a Las Vegas native)

Horrible family memory won't be forgotten soon enough!!
We went on ride with our 5 year old and his best friend's family.
Unfortunately we shared the ride with older couple and their middle aged son.
Brief acknowledgment from the older couple that our two 5 year olds were normal rambunctious excitement would be welcomed.
However their middle aged son decided to have an episode halfway through the ride and literally yell at our 5 year old son to calm down.
As any father would I got between him and my son and he did not calm down and continued profanities.
I went on defense mode protecting my family from this clearly unstable individual who happened to be carrying a knife visible on  his belt.
I pleaded with his elder parents to intervene and reason with their son as clearly this would escalate into a physical altercation.
At that point they managed to bring him down but both my son and his best friend both in the clutches of their distraught mothers were clearly beyond having any experience other than us calming them and hoping that they will be ok.
They were not ok.
The ride ended and upon departure the elder couple and their Middle aged son bee lined for the exit.
I got together with the other disturbed father and we went to get security to stop this maniac and get him to apologize.
NO SECURITY IN SITE!!!
I stopped the maniac and yelled for security to help with the situation.
NO SECURITY IN SITE!!!
These people walked out the door and I continued to yell for help.
NO SECURITY IN SITE!!!
Finally a Manager came out and wanted me to calm down "not to interfere with anyone's positive experience".
So I managed to calm down and after clearly explaining our horrible experience he offered nothing but a simple sorry.
That is the best way to describe their security and customer care....SORRY.
Funny thing is there is a sign on their front door with a picture of a gun with a line through it...what about a maniac and a knife   Proceed with caution

WARNING!!!!!
They need to do a background check and walk you through a metal detector before you EVER set foot on that Ferris wheel.
We we're 2 married couples with our 2 five year olds having a beautiful night.
Decided it would be fun to ride this new Ferris wheel.
We ended up stuck for a half hour(which felt like an eternity) with a physco path 40 something man, armed with a knife, yelling obscenities at us saying our children were to loud.
He obliviously had serious psychological problems so we held our kids close for the remainder of the ride hoping he wouldn't do anything to harm us.
When we got off the ride the man tried to bolt!
My husband yelled "HELP!!!!
STOP THAT MAN WE NEED SECURITY!!!
" NO ONE came to help or tried to stop this mental person.
My husband stood in front  of the exit trying to detain him but the man pushed past my husband  & ran out.
The manager finally appeared & was of NO help as well.
He asked my husband to calm down so he "wouldn't interrupt anyone's else's experience.
" The manager was unfazed by what we had gone through & didn't even offer to refund our money.
He only apologized & said "we could go on the ride again for free.
" NO THANK YOU.
NEVER AGAIN.
It was a horrible experience we will NEVER forget & the worst part is it all took place in front of our 5 year old son & his 5 year old girl friend.
A HORRIBLE  & VERY SCARY family experience for all of us that we will NEVER forget.

The view is absolutely amazing, as is the staff!
We went to see the High Roller about a week ago and we were not disappointed!
Go at night.
It's worth the extra money and the lights are spectacular.

Two adults and two young children = $108 to ride The High Roller.
25 to 40 people can fit in each cube, so expect to ride High Roller with people you do not know.
Some people that got in the cube before us appeared drunk and wild...glad we were not stuck with them in our cube for 30 mins.
Great views, kids loved it.
Probably would be even better at night with all the lights on.
Had to wait about 15 - 20 mins just to board the ride.
If you are in Vegas and have a few bucks extra to drop.... check this out.
The view is awesome, and the staff operating The High Roller were very, very nice.
The Linq is now open and it's a neat little alley that connects the strip to the High Roller.

Here's a Crystal Clear HD video of the High Roller at Night that I recorded.
In the video, you will see how the boarding process works, what it looks like from inside, and of course the beautiful Vegas Strip at Night in glorious HD  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GPQEoGLCun8  I rode it at night and it costs me $35 bucks with $2 service fee.
So I ended paying $37.
I don't understand why they tack on the service fee.
Why not, just make it $37.
You are paying $37 for just one rotation.
The ride duration lasted 30 minutes.
I heard that the pod can hold up to 40 passangers, but in reality, they wouldn't want to put more than 20 guests in one pod or else people wouldn't have enough space to look out the windows.
The view of the Vegas strip was spectacular since it's in the dead center of the Vegas Strip.
There's even a 5 seconds countdown to the highest point on the wheel.
You can see the countdown at the 6 min 30 seconds mark in the video.
It's best to go on it at night instead of during the day.
That's why it costs so much.
At night, it's spectacular.
Will I do it again?
Yes.
Only if they reduce there price down to Stratosphere tower admission price of $18.
It's a little pricey for just one rotation.
I do believe that they will offer discount in the near future probably by end of summer.
So, here's crystal cleared HD video of the HIgh Roller from my YouTube channel:   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GPQEoGLCun8  SoCal Attractions 360

We came here on a Tuesday, a bit before 6pm  - $24.95 before 6pm  - $4 other fees (I don't know exactly what the other fees are but it seems like $2/person) $53.90  - We parked in the Flamingo parking structure.
- We got a tickets real fast.
If you use a credit card, you can get it off from the salesman that uses the iPhone.
Ticket is printed off the phone too.
- Max pod can hold up to 40, but when we went there were only about 10 people in it.
- Constantly moving.
You got to hop your way in and out.
Good thing they have a net beneath so the slow pokes.
haha.
The entrance and exit is curved, so no jumping necessary.
- 30 min ride.
- Tried to do a panoramic pic but is hard bc people get in the way.
fail.
- Highest point is 550 ft.
There's an exciting countdown.
- Pods remind me of DBZ capsule corp. haha  - This is the world's tallest observation wheel.
2nd is the Singapore flyer at 541 ft.  - Great view of the Vegas sunset.
- Great addition to the Vegas strip!
Definite must ride even for locals.
Good way to re-appreciate the city again.

**Talk about uneventful, anti-climactic, overpriced, and overall boring**  PROTIP: Go at night when you can see lights.
It's very boring during the day.
Thank god this was free for me; otherwise, I would've given it a lower rating.
Lets begin with a few things wrong with this attraction: 1.
The High Roller is so awkwardly placed behind the strip so you don't actually get to see anything on the strip; you see the high buildings and hotels and that's about it.
The place to buy tickets is actually not in the lobby with the prices of the ride (where it would logically be); instead you get tickets on the side of the building with NO SIGNS.
There are more employees working at the High Roller than there are guests (who thought this would make money?).
When you're inside the sphere that goes around, the music is so ridiculously loud that you NEED to be drunk to enjoy it.
There are monitors that line the top that tell you how high you've gotten, 100ft... 200ft...300ft... etc; however, if the sphere ever stops for maintenance reasons, the count is totally off.
We were at the apex when the monitor told us we were 3/4 of the way through with our ride.
FAIL.
Pros: Cool if it's free Cons: Expensive if it's not:

You no longer have to be a high roller to get the best view in town.
The High Roller Ferris Wheel will take you on a 30-minute orbit, offering sweeping views of The Strip, for less money then you'll lose in 5 minutes at a blackjack table.
Located at the end of The LINQ, a trendy new shopping promenade, this new attraction reaches record heights at 550 feet, outdoing even the London Eye by over 100 feet.
Having been on the London Eye, I found the High Roller to be a comparably breathtaking experience, minus paying twice as much and travelling half way around the world.
Like the London Eye, passengers are loaded into enclosed pods, which should help the slightly acrophobic individuals like myself feel safer.
A daytime ride (before 6pm) is about $25, while a nighttime ride (after 6pm) is more expensive at around $35, but worth the price hike to see Sin City lit up like a Lite-Brite toy.
With shopping, shows, and sinful delights, I like to think of Vegas as a collection of spectacular experiences for people of all backgrounds and pocketbook sizes, and being at the top of this wheel is an affordable high that you may be a bit reluctant to come down from.

Not the hype that was advertised, the view was okay but just another Vegas attraction to suck money.
would be cool for a romantic setting if offered a dining experience or something similar.

Great attraction to visit and get the best view of the strip.
I was a little nervous before riding because of my slight fear of heights, but it really wasn't bad at all!
It was also moving more quicker than I thought.
Outside of the ride it looks like it isn't even moving but once you're actually riding it, it's at a perfect speed to overlook the Vegas strip :)

Its a cool experience but its a 1 time thing.
It gets boring pretty quick, and its overpriced!!!
i don't think its worth the money $37per person.
its a 30 min roundtrip, you share the globe container what ever you want to call it) with other people.
i will not be riding this again unless its free.

Great experience, I suggest going both in the day time and night time and planning it around the Bellagio water fountain schedule.
At the top of the high roller, you can see it perfect.
I enjoyed this with my husband and I will bring my 9 month old next time to ride it with us.
I was reading the negative reviews below and I don't think it is entirely the high rollers fault...
Yes they should have more security, but it is meant to be shared with other guests.
They cannot reserve the space just for you and your kids.
Having a child of my own though I can understand your trauma and I am so sorry!
That guy needed to be detained and not be allowed back on the ride.
What we did was just wait until there wasn't a line and we got our own pod by ourselves.
Maybe you should try it to, because you will actually love the ride.

This was a fun new way to see all of the Vegas lights!
We came in at night around 8pm.
The ticket line was long so I suggest getting tickets on-line or elsewhere.
If going during the day the cost is 25.00 and at night 35.00 plus tax.
You'll be directed up some stairs and there is a photo option and a bar as you are making your way to the wheel (we brought our own cocktails).
Once in line for the roller it moved quickly.
Each cabin will hold about 40 ppl.
It moved quickly when getting in the wheel doesn't stop to let you in or out so you'd better get in where you can fit in!
Once the doors close there are tv screens with a narrator giving you information on the elevation and keep the ride entertaining.
The high point is about 550 ft. and views are amazing!!
The ride takes about 30 minutes and once off you are directed down where you can view the photo taken at the beginning/ buy them and  a walk through the souvenir shop.
Overall this was a great experience!
Check off the Vegas bucket list!

I'm in a giant pod in the sky!
I actually had a dream I was riding this one night before it opened... We got to ride before they officially opened!
Hunnie Bunnie was thrilled she got to finally ride it AND ride it before her cousin!
DEFINITELY wait to go at night time so you can see all of the pretty lights over the Valley!
Not even worth it during the day.
Before you get on they take your photo which has different backgrounds for you to choose from after your ride.
In the waiting area you can purchase cocktails.
There are benches inside the pod, but otherwise there is plenty of standing room and room to walk around.
There is music and there are TV monitors but nothing was playing when we were riding.
I think my one ride will be enough for my life.

I personally loved it & had an amazing time.
Line to purchase tickets moved fast & All employees were very helpful.
I love how you just hop on it and hop right off it.
It was a really nice experience.
A little bit pricy YES.
Is it something I would do twice NO it's a one time thing.
Tip: do it at night!!
( I don't know why anyone will go during the day)

This is pretty awesome!
You definitely want to go at night....the view is beautiful!
You can hardly feel it moving.
I stood right up next to the glass and felt safe!
Very romantic!
Better than blowing your money on the slots!

A little pricy (about $70 for two after 6pm).
Awesome view.
We had no line on a Wednesday night.
If you use the flash when taking a pic it will glair off the glass... Just a heads up

What a total rip off.
Waited on line to buy tickets that may have 60 to 35 dollars depending on the person we spoke to.
Plus an additional 2 dollar service charge per ticket.
No one knew what was going on and there was confusion among the  staff.
Do your self a favor.
Save your money and go see the city from the roof of any parking garage

No.
Here's why:  Even in the day they charge $50 for two people + $4 for the privileged of buying tickets (how corporations have conditioned us to accept this is beyond me (maybe they should start charging "wheel rotation fees" or or "safety fees.").
And what do you get for that $54?
30 minutes in a bubble with 40 other dopes getting a view you could get from tens of thousands of rooms in Vegas, not to mention just by having a drink in the Stratosphere Bar (which is 200' higher), or taking off from the airport.
And, of that 30 minutes, only a few of them are from the wheel's apex.
Rooms in Vegas are so cheap that that extra $54 (they charge $74 at night) would surely upgrade you to a room with a great view for 24 hours and without 40 other people.
On top of that, there's this comedian video screen thing playing in the bubble most of the time.
Some of it's amusing, but then it gets to the not-so-subtle advertising as when he tells us about how he loves the "amazing cupcakes at the Sprinkles shop" on The Linq or when the trivia game asks about the history of the Yard House restaurant (also, you guessed it, on the Linq).
Who cares?!
The Linq, by the way, is just overpriced, slickly-marketed eats, bars, etc.
Then, of course, you get dropped off in the gift shop where they offer to sell you a $35 photo of yourself so you can always be haunted by the memory of what a schmuck you were.
They're trying to sell this as some great experience.
It isn't.
Not in Vegas.
It may have cost them a lot to build, and the engineering is impressive, no doubt.
And if it was located in an area where there was no other way to get the view, well, maybe it would be worth it, but in Vegas it's worth maybe $10.
Really.
Spend your $74 for a better hotel room or drinks at the Stratosphere  Wish I had...

Awesome!
You have to do this at night.
The lights are spectacular and the view is amazing.
We were at the very top when the Bellagio water show started -amazing!

Fun and relaxing with a great view, but super pricey!
(Then again what in Vegas is not pricey!
) During the day the ride costs about $25 per person (don't know how much it is for a child).
During the night, the ride costs about $35 per person (again I don't know how much a child costs).
It takes about 30 minutes to go around in 1 full circle and you only ride it once.
The ride is very very very slow and takes you up to 550 feet up in the sky.
It is very high up in the sky, but the view is gorgeous.
Take lots of photo.
When I rode it there were only 12 of us inside one of the pods but I believe it can fit up to 30 people per pod and I think there are more than a dozen pods.
(Don't remember...didn't count how many pods there were.
)  One thing that was confusing was the lady who sold us the ticket (she was standing midway on the sidewalk of the Linq) said we could take drinks and things to eat inside.
So on the way to board the ride there was a Sprinkles cupcake and ice cream store.
We went in and  bought ice cream for each of us and when we tried to enter the building for the ride, a gentleman said no food allowed inside.
So we had to quickly eat our ice cream to board the ride on time.
Lucky us it was not busy that day and we bought tickets that gave us a 20 minute window to walk casually and buy Sprinkles ice cream (and eat it).
The only thing you can take on the ride is a drink (alcoholic/non-alcholic) that you buy from them once you pass the checkpoint and are on the second floor.

Watching the water show from the Bellagio from the High Roller is a great way to see the show from another angle, avoid all those crowds, and see all the glory of the Vegas nightlights.
A great way to spend a fun, relaxing evening on the Strip.
Be sure to leave extra time for parking.

Awesome!
To be 550 ft over Las Vegas was great.
They play some fun music and everyone was really social inside the orb.
IA  It was worth the $25.
Its a 30 minute ride so go to the bathroom before you get in.

Loved it.
I am afraid of heights and survived.
Very beautiful at sunset for sure but not sure it's worth almost $40.
Hopefully once it's around longer the prices reduce.

Pretty awesome tourist attraction.
Takes you way up high.
Kinda romantic of you think.
You can't bring your outside drinks in.....
However, there is a bar near the entrance and they give you your drinks in this plastic souvenir cup that you can keep.
Those drinks you can bring into the high roller.
What a way to make money right?
Haha   The views are awesome and you don't have to worry about your pod being too crowded either.
Oh ya, you have to walk on while it's still moving.... Don't worry there's a safety net.
It only moves 1mph so it's really slow.
I can't even tell it moving!
This is definitely something to do while in Vegas!

went last saturday afternoon, wasn't too busy at 2pm.
the Linq was busy though!
lot of people walking around.
anyway, tickets are easy to purchase...and total time up to platform for entry is only about 5 minutes.
the pods are in constant motion, so you board while it's still moving.
but don't worry, there is a net if you fall!
ride is a total of 30 minutes, with only a few times it did stop completely during the total rotation.
ride is very smooth and effortless.
worth the $25 per person admission.
view is amazing.
our pod only had about 10 people in it, and it didn't seem crowded at all.
they are very large.
we'd be back, but at night!
everything is new and clean around the Linq.
worth a visit.

Props on the designer (Arup Engineering) and their finished product.
It's hard to believe that this is the latest.. tallest "ferris wheel" in the world since their 2008 Singapore Flyer standing at 541 ft.
The high roller is 9 ft taller than the flyer and bragging rights becomes ours!!!
A great tourist attraction hands down and worth every cent if you decide to hop on!
The 360° glass view is breathtaking.
Located as the main attraction in the newest addition to the Las Vegas strip "The Linq".. but more than that.. it exposes the true beauty of this small city in the dessert at a view you can only find in comparison to it's freestanding cousin "Stratosphere"   Be part of 2014 history and do it once!
-SCA

So as 4 of us were waiting in line to buy tickets at 9:15pm on a Sunday, a random, friendly girl gave us three tickets and in a flash she was gone.
We were in total disbelief.
I was still skeptical up to the part where they scanned the ticket.
Saved us $111!!
I owe her some Sprinkles at the very least if we ever cross paths again.
Currently the largest observatory wheel in the world (wonder how much of a pain it will be when it becomes the 2nd), there's not much to say about the ride itself.
You go around for 30 minutes, see the strip, snap pics and it's over.
The waiting area before getting to the actual wheel is very Disney Worldesque.
The "guide" is a guy on a video screen dishing out facts and bad jokes (420 ft!
You're really high!!).
I wonder why they didn't have different performers from Caesars shows doing video segments instead?
Imagine what the Gazillionaire and Penny would say?!
They could do the "quiet tour" with Teller.
The biggest variable with how enjoyable your ride will be are the others in your pod.
Each pod is supposed to fit 40 people.
I saw a family with 5 small and loud kids on their rollerskate sneakers in front of us and I would have done almost anything to avoid being in the same pod including lighting myself on fire.
We rode with about 20 others that were fine and excited to be on the ride.
Other things:  - Try to go for the seats on the immediate right upon getting into the pod.
- Nighttime has to be better than daytime.
- Please go to the restroom before getting on.

Fun & neat way to see a different view of the city.
Way over priced especially since there is no child's price.
I am still glad we did it once but if you are on a budget you may want to reconsider.
The ticket purchase booth is oddly far from the entrance & confusing with the 10 minute increments.
I purchased my tickets & a friend behind me could not get the same time because that time had past.
We asked before he purchased & they said it was ok & we didn't have a problem.
Not sure what the purpose of the times on the ticket are.
We heard the fit about 40+ people in each pod but only had about 12 in ours.
That was pretty much the perfect amount & hopefully they won't ever go over 20 unless specifically requested.
More than about 15 would start to restrict your ability to move around freely with out bumping into others.

the High Roller had it's Grand Opening just days before my friends and I arrived.
what luck!
the Linq shopping plaza which houses the ferris wheel, was conveniently connected to the Flamingo hotel where we were staying.
We weren't informed until later but if you show your hotel room key at the ticket booth, you can save $5 off the ticket price.
Shortly after we paid, it was time to make our way to the loading bay.
I was especially fond of the air-conditionined walk through since it reminded me of Disney attraction walk throughs complete with winding turn styles, TV screens, and futuristic background music.
The escalator took us to the Sky Bar where drinks and light snacks could be purchased and taken on the ride.
We chatted with the lovely bartender, Phaedra, who made us some really good margaritas then we made our way to the platform and stepped onto a very slow moving pod to take us on our ride in the sky.
People need not fear stumbling and falling when entering the pod.
Although the ferris wheel is constantly moving, it goes slow enough for people to carefully board and enjoy the views for the thirty minute ride.
My friends and I were lucky enough to get our own pod but each can hold up to forty people.
The surrounding windows give you a panoramic view of the strip and the TVs always give notification of how many feet you've reached...550 being the highest.
Also on the TVs, was a host providing satire and comic relief every few minutes.
I especially loved the on-purpose "we're so high right now!
" joke he made once we reached 420 feet.
Ha.
420. good one, guy.
The ride is well worth it.
When you look beyond the hotels and casinos, you can appreciate the beautiful mountains and desert best seen from 550 feet.

We wanted to start our day off right and go on the Farris wheel one of the workers told us we could go purchase alcohol so we went and purchased a small bottle and drinks we go to get on they were hassling us and all of a sudden said we couldn't get on because of our alcohol purchase then the manager Carolina was.
Such a bitch excuses my language but I've never delt with such a rude closed minded woman int life we were being nice and explaining our situation and your attitude was ridicules just wasted 140 for nothing and ruined our day they need to train there employees to the correct Information before they have people waste there money before they haute people what a waste of my time deffinatily not manager quality

LOVE it!!!
You can see everything from the atop the high roller.
Well worth the price and so glad we did it.
We went daytime and didn't regret it at all.
I imagine at night the lights are brilliant but you wouldn't be able to see as far.
Choose for yourself, but we loved it.

This place needs to work on their customer service.
If there is no one in line, let people take a pod of their own.
I realize that the kids working here are just doing their job, but the manager had totally a nonsensical rationale for their policy.
Whatever.
The view was amazing and it's a fun alternative attraction in Vegas, but I hope they get their customer service up to par before the heavy tourist season.

Very cool 30 minute ride

Flying in over the Strip at night, this new structure was the first thing I saw all lit up, I knew if it was open I had to go!
Located in the new shopping alley by the Linq, you can't miss this giant observation wheel at the end.
There are a few automated ticket booths along the walls down the alley along with a physical building to purchase tickets.
Its $24.95 each during the day and $34.95 after 6pm, along with taxes and processing fees.
Kinda pricey, but I had never done anything like this before and was willing to pay.
You buy tickets for specific times, but as this is a new semi-pricey attraction we bought tickets for the time it was then and got on right away.
In typical Vegas style, you pass a bar going up, which I highly recommend as you can take your drinks up with you.
In the line you are coerced into taking a picture in front of a green screen to be viewed after your trip around the wheel.
You can tell they expect this to be a big attraction because the next room in line is a huge circular room with many twists and turns for a huge line, complete with funny informative videos.
And finally you're up!
there was no line still so we were immediately ushered into our pod along with the 6 other people in front of us.
The wheel doesn't stop (unless you're disabled) but it goes pretty slow so it's an easy step.
Inside your pod is all windows for better viewing, along with some plastic red benches off to the sides to sit and sip on your drink if you so choose.
I was super excited so I stood and enjoyed the view the whole 30 minute trip.
Several TVs line the top of the pod, showing you where your pod is on the wheel, how many feet up you are, and the funny info guy telling you various facts occasionally.
When he's not there, some hip tunes are.
As a person wary of heights, I got a tad nervous sometimes when I looked down, but overall is was a very smooth trip.
You couldn't feel it moving at all!
And the views are incredible!
Tons of picture opportunities, mine was clicking away the whole time.
You make friends with the strangers in your pod too, wanting to take pictures with your friends without your arm in it.
We were lucky enough to go as the sunset around 6:30ish so we saw the daylight views and the nightlights on our round.
But sadly, this pleasure trip comes to an end.
Again, it does not stop but getting off is just as easy as getting on.
The path leads you down into a photo booth to purchase your pictures if you so desire that they took in line, with various scenic back drops.
And then you are in the gift shop!
Tons of shirts, cups, keychains, shot glasses, and even High Roller chap sticks galore!
This is definitely worth the money, I'd go more than once if I could!

The last part of my playing tourist yesterday was to ride the High Roller.
It has been great fun to watch this being built and to anticipate riding it.
I have a fear of heights and I abhor glass elevators.
This seemed to me like the making of a perfect fetal position ride.
But, I screwed up my courage, bought my ticket, and scampered into the car.
Let's back up a bit.
You can buy tickets online, at one of the many self-serve kiosks in the Linq and other places around the Quad/Linq area.
You can also buy in person.
If you do, and you have a Total Rewards card, the $2 fee you pay online is discounted.
No special price for Nevada residents.
After getting your ticket and going through several theme park like queuing areas, one on the first floor and then another one on the second floor at the top of the escalators.
After walking down a ramp, you're urged to move along quickly because the wheel generally doesn't stop and you enter after the people have exited on the other side.
Once everyone is in, the car door shuts and is locked.
The ride is very smooth and it was very easy for me to do.
I was so interested in moving from side to side taking photos and enjoying the view.
It really didn't bother me.
After what seemed like 10 minutes, the ride was over and it was time to exit.
I strode down the ramp with a swagger as if to say, "Yes, I did it!
Yo!
"   Now, to go back and do the ride at night to see the lights.

As a long standing Las Vegas local, we have seen it all.
We went to the High Roller, excited to see the newest attraction.
I have a fear of heights, but I felt I would be safe on the High Roller.
The pods are in continual motion, but very slow.
You do not feel the height.
I would be more concerned with someone who doesn't like closed spaces vs heights in the pod.
The sound echos off the walls pretty easy so the person across the pod can be speaking to the person next to them and it feels they are sitting right next to you.
We went during the day and plan to go back at night, so we have both experiences.
I would recommend someone contacting the Linq or other hotels to clean up their roofs as this is part of the view.
Some pretty bad looking views out there.

Timing is everything.
We planned our adventure on the High Roller to begin just at sun down so when we reached the top all of Vegas was lit up.
We had no waiting issues and actually were able to get one earlier than our reservation time was set up for.
Bar at the top while you wait is smart and handy, although please be sure you have used the restroom as you will not be seeing one for another 30 minutes plus.
Don't be "That Person" that ruins it for everyone.
That being said the ride itself was smooth sailing.
You do not feel like you are even moving.
Pods are quite roomy and have some seating available.
We stood as we wanted to take in as much as we could.
Have your cameras and smart phones ready - you will want to capture a few shots for sure!
I would highly recommend this and would definitely do this again!

I am a local Las Vegan.
This is the dumbest "ride" on the strip.
Not to be totally rude but it was stupid, waste of $26.00.
The view to the west is of the roof of all the hotels (ugly) and the view to the east is of a huge parking lot.
I went for a ride on a Thursday at 12noon (it opens at noon FYI).
Although there was no waiting in line for me at that time, there are 2 theme park type "zig zag" waiting/staging lines at two locations, one is hidden up the escalator so don't be fooled, there will be hours of waiting, especially at night for the lamest 30 minute ride of your life.
Yawn.... Get me off!
Entering and exiting the pod is much like a ski lift, it does not stop so you have to gracefully leap off!
Just another FYI.
And, the price at night is $36.
No locals or military discounts.
There are photographers inside (just like at Disney) that take your picture against a green wall to sell you a photo at the end.
Photography is allowed, but the glare and reflection is an issue.

Well, I've been on the London Eye, so when in Vegas for a night (work meeting), and faced with the the opportunity to ride on the World's current tallest Ferris Wheel it seemed a great idea.
The view as you are going up is definitely obstructed but once you get about 2/3 of the way to the top the view is amazing.
I only had my iPhone to take pictures but got some great shots.
A few critical notes:  1) I wish the'd dim the lights for night trips.
Would allow you to take better photos without the glare of the overhead lights in your pod.
2) I also think they should have looked into glare-free glass for the pods ... for the same reasons!
(Can you tell I'm a photographer?

Watch your step!
I went on the high roller before it officially started charging and I must say it was a wonderful free ride!
The entrance is modern with an after thought of feeling Like you're at an adult disneyland because your are in line for a spell, then taking a picture in front of a green screen, which you know they will have for you afterwards.
When you get to the platform, youll see that the attraction never stops and you ought to walk quickly into the pod, you'll see why when you get to that point.
Its a steady ride up and I went when the sun set behind the other hotels and seeing the casino lights flicker on was quite enjoyable.
The pod was clean and comfortable to be standing in for 30 minutes.
Which is surprising because of how many people can fit in the pod...about 30 I believe.
Now would I pay for the pleasure of this new attraction?
Perhaps only one more time.
The next time ill bring my own alcohol.
But you be the judge!

The High Roller is just one of those things that you have to do at least once.
And if you want to do it right, then do it once the moon is out and the sun has gracefully bowed down.
The ticket prices do increase after 6pm, but for me the view was worth it.
We paid slightly under $150 (after taxesd and fees) for 4 adults and my son was free.
There was a line for the tickets the night we went, but quickly found out that their are windows where tickets can be purchased.
A lady was helping us and almost double charged us but quickly caught and fixed her error.
Once we purchased our tickets, entering was fairly easy.
They did a quick security check of the ladies purses, no check on the men.
We then followed some escalators and made our way up.
Once you enter the loading area, they herd you into different waiting sections.
Boarding our pod did not take a long wait but boarding it with a child and my mother was almost a challenge.
They had to run more than we did a fast walk.
There were roughly 20 people in our pod and only half of them were intoxicated, so it wasn't a bad ride.
There is ample seating for everyone and music to help you enjoy your ride.
The pod moves so slow, it doesn't actually feel like you are moving at all.
Which is great for taking pictures.
They have monitors in the pods but the music was so loud, I couldn't really hear what was being said on the monitor.
It does let you know when you reach the highest point of 550 feet and that is nice.
It was a wonderful experience and we got some amazing pictures.
I highly recommend it for anyone to do at least once.

Definitely worth doing!
A little expensive though, so I would suggest doing it at night time to really enjoy the experience and view.
The view is amazing, however taking good photographs can be difficult because of the glass..

I had family come to town that wanted to do this and I'm afraid of heights so I was worried but we had a blast.
Theres a bar before you get on so we were able to enjoy a drink during the ride and the pod was big enough that the height didn't bother me.
We went at night and the view was amazing!
It moves slow enough that my cousin was able to grab some beautiful pictures on her phone.
The price is a little on the high side but I'd go again if the party I was with was wanting to.

I'm terrified of heights, but #YOLO.
We went at night to see the town lit up.
It was a Tuesday and not at all busy, we walked right on.
The six of my group only shared a pod with four other people so we had plenty of room to sit or move around as we pleased.
There is a bar in the waiting area and you can bring drinks onto the observation wheel if you like.
My playmate-for-life was rather taken with the design and artwork, a very stylized mod, 1950's motif.
The attendants very helpfully suggest you visit the restrooms before boarding as you will be in the air for 30 minutes with no access to any facilities.
The staff takes your picture in front of a green screen before you get on.
When you exit through the gift shop, it will be superimposed on a couple different views in the wheel.
You board as the pod is moving, so step lively and don't miss or you'll land in the safety nets strung below.
(I secretly hoped to see someone do this.
Yes, I'm aware this makes me a terrible person.
)  The revolution takes 30 minutes and there is very little sensation of movement, even in extremely high winds.
There are screens that display information about the wheel, your present location, and other pieces of trivia delivered by a quirky but family-friendly comedian.
This is quite a feat of engineering and the view is mind-blowing.

The high roller is at the end of a trendy row of casino and clubs.
It's geared toward a younger crowd and has an outdoor club feel.
The night time ride is $37 a person.
It was not an amazing view since you see the parking lot in the rear of the area for most of the ride.
There is a person who CEOs on the screen and explains what height your at and does a apex countdown.
I would go once to say you've done it but it's not as fun as the bars on the ground.

This is such a cool new addition to the strip in Vegas.
Party in the sky.
30 min round trip.

Great!
A must do when in Las Vegas!
We are locals, but will definitely take out of town guests!

So much fun!
Went during the day and there as NO wait and our pod wasn't full at all... offered such an awesome view of Vegas!
Can hardly wait to go back and check it out at night.
Loved that I could purchase and bring a cocktail on with me...helped ease my nerves!

SOOO Disappointing.
Nice views of the backs of buildings, air conditioner units on rooftops and parking lots.
The picture taking is especially disappointing.
View from the rooftop bars at some of the casinos and the Eiffel Tower are much better.
This is going to go down in history as one of the worst projects of all time.
Once the newness wears off, I expect it will be emptier than it already is.
There are no crowds.
The music on the pods is annoying and the video in inane trivia and blather and bad jokes.
The pods are so self-contained you dont feel like you are moving.
Just a long elevator ride.

Drop dead gorgeous view surrounding your 30min ride.
It's about 36 bucks pp if you want to experience this at night.
I purposely chose the very last ride at 1:30am so we could hit up several lounge before ended up in this 'bubble'.
Staff were friendly, only three other people in this ride at the same time, perfect!
Don't expect to be going semi fast cuz it's not...VERY slow.
It's romantic.
Have to be back to check out the Linq...looks really cool, updated spot on the strip.

Loved it.
We are locals and this was our first ride.
I would recommend for tourist or locals.
We went of a Thursday afternoon, no lines.
great views.
We had a part of 6 and got a car all to ourselves,   Added bonus was great shops and dining choices at the Linq.

I am at least partially to blame for my experience at the High Roller.
I allowed myself to go through this with all of my senses.
If I was less than fully aware of what was going on I probably wouldn't have been bothered by the 6 different mini-lines we had to wade through.
The views behind the former Imperial Palace at night are far from spectacular.
I doubt there are any other places in Vegas at such an altitude that have a worse view regardless of price.
I'm not saying the view is bad, but for the price ($70+ for two) there is much better value to be had elsewhere.
Surprisingly parking is free and offers a nice view of the structure.
I won't go into the  details but in general processed and cheesy aptly describe the experience.
There may be enough going on in and around the ferris wheel to distract you from the relatively high price for a forgettable experience.
On your life journey I would recommend you pass on High Roller.

I was pretty psyched to find out this would be open when I paid a visit to Las Vegas last week.
This was definitely on my TO DO list while visiting, plus I'm always down for something new as I visit every year.
We got there pretty late on a Tuesday night - I don't recall what time this thing runs till but it was after a late dinner.
I knew before going that it was going to cost me $35.
We have something kind of similar in Chicago at Navy Pier, I can't recall how much that costs but it is NOTHING compared to the High Roller...it's more like a carnival ferris wheel.
Yes, it's worth $35 because not only do I only visit once, but the view is AMAZING!!!
Best view in Vegas as I've been to Voodoo Lounge, the clubs at the top of the Palms, no view compares to this view!
As other reviews have mentioned...you pay at a kiosk outside, it's $35 at night.
You cannot bring drinks with you, but you will pass a bar before going up.
I HAD to get a drink on my way in...and I want to say a blue moon cost me about $7.
As with every tourist attraction everywhere they take your picture before you go on, and you exit through a store where you can see your picture if you'd like to purchase it.
I don't even recall looking at ours when we left as I've been through that routine too many times.
We had NO wait whatsoever during this entire experience - probably being late on a Tuesday night and all really helped.
I read another review that suggested standing to the right in the pod when you enter so I did...I'd have to say that IS the best spot.
Our pod had about 10 people are so and it was easy to move about in there.
The timing was just right as well as we were able to catch the Bellagio Fountain show once we hit the top.
If you have never been to Vegas or haven't been there in a long time, or visiting soon...I highly recommend this tourist attraction, it's really amazing!

This observation wheel was high on my list of things to do this trip to Vegas.
I romanticized the view of the city in my head but the actual experience fell short.
I couldn't find the hours online but we arrived on a Tuesday night about 11:30pm.
They informed us that the last riders would have to be on the wheel by 12.
After paying nearly $80 for our two tickets, a quick trip to a really dirty bathroom (isn't this place brand new?!?
) and getting a free drink (I found a text code in the taxi cab interactive TV on the way over) we walked up to the landing where you get in the pods.
There were four in our party and another three people paired with us.
I'm not sure why though since there was several open pods that we could have each been in by ourselves (there were about 10 people in the other pod so I guess I shouldn't complain).
Entering the pod is interesting as it never stops and once inside, they lock you in adn there are two benches on either side that allow you to sit down.
The pod was clean and luckily the windows were too.
As other's have mentioned, there is a guide up on the screen and I can't say he added to the experience.
As we climbed and reach the top, the view was anticlimactic.
Last year we had dinner at the Stratosphere and that view is better!
And for another $70, you can have a great dinner!
Overall I can't say I regret going but I definitely wouldn't go again.

A couple weeks before our trip to Vegas, out of the blue we were wondering where the highest Ferris wheel in the world is (I am a huge Ferris wheel fan).
Imagine my delight when I found out it had newly opened on the Strip!
I had to do a little convincing because my partner doesn't love heights, but the fact that the viewing capsule is all enclosed made a big difference.
We got tickets for nighttime because we wanted to see the lights, and it was awesome.
We even saw the Bellagio fountain from the top of the wheel!
Unfortunately, we had to share our capsule with some really drunk obnoxious dudes.
That's really the only drawback.
Overall a beautiful experience and a great way to see the lights of Vegas.
It's definitely a little pricey, but the experience is worth it.

Always bet on Caesars Entertainment to provide a great experience... except when you lose on the tables.
The High Roller is their most recent gamble to entice people to walk through their newly refurbished properties.
It's worth the price to get a one of a kind view of the strip in a rotating pod.
Give it a try when you have nothing else to do but wait in an air conditioned area with strangers.

Average, only because I paid the night pricing and it was still light out, without any of Vegas neon lights.
Took the ride for the pictures but they didn't come out as good as I hoped.
Still a fun experience, and the worlds largest ferris wheel.
Practically a must in Vegas.
Drinks at the bar before the high roller are extremely weak.

We went there to have a good time, but the whole experience was a terrible one.
First off went to the ticket window that is right next to it that is a window in a wall.
The girl was very rude.
At one point I asked her if there was a discount for locals (as I was handing her my credit card).
She said no but if I have a Total Rewards card there is a discount.
I asked her not to charge the credit card, and where I can get a Total Rewards card (it is the players card for Harrahs, Caesars, etc).
She said she didn't know then SWIPED MY CARD!
I told her I did not give her permission to do that and that I wanted it refunded.
She told me there were no refunds.
I told her to get me a manager to refund it or I will call the card company and have them cancel it there on that end.
The manager came over, canceled it, and told me that I could get a total rewards card a couple doors down!
Ugh!
well I got it, and noticed that there was an indoor place to get the tickets there.
So I got tickets from much nicer people and went on the ride.
Now the ride is still expensive at $34 at night (why go during the day?
) and the first 25% and last 25% is a view of a parking lot and sides of building.
So only the middle half is good.
Do it once when friends are in town as I doubt anyone would do it twice.

It's definitely not worth the $35 for a night time ride.
Drinks at the bar were made really weak and u pay $12 for them!
The great part of this attraction is obviously the view!
Im scared of heights but it was an adventure!
30mins of amazing views of the city.
You are placed in a bubble on a humungous ferris wheel.
My bf and I went around 11pm, we got our own pod, it was intimate and romantic!
Total tourist attraction!
Staff was super friendly.

The biggest mistake I made this year.
For starters the staff was rude and displayed poor customer service.
The ride is mediocre, I would rather buy a timeshare in Louisville, Kentucky that pay to ride the "High Roller" again.
Don't do it !!!!

Great views of the city.
Full disclosure: I got to ride for free, and didn't have to wait in line, so for that, it was awesome.
However, if I was paying and waiting, I might just go someplace where I can enjoy a cocktail with my outstanding views.
If you're a tourist with a little money to burn, the High Roller is cool.
If you're not afraid to take a cab (or you're local), go to the Mandarin Bar or the martini bar at the Stratosphere.

I went during the day mid-morning and there was only a group of 4 elderly people with us, so our ride was pleasant.
I don't recommend coming during the day.
The view would be comparable to any high rise hotel on the strip or probably the observation deck at Eiffel Tower.
The strip is really pretty at night with all the lights and the Bellagio Fountains going off so I imagine it would be nicer to see.
Warning, it's 30 minutes of being in a pod with no cell service!

Not a good experience for me, I am scared of height, and I am claustrophobic, if it weren't for hubby, I would never have agreed to go on this ride, it wasn't fun for me, I couldn't move and couldn't look out, I just stayed at one spot for 30 minutes.....
The ride was very slow, but I could still feel the shaking now and then, probably because of the high wind that night.
What I didn't like the most was the ride didn't stop when we stepped on it, it was very scary!
Hubby bought fast lane pass, it was $60 per person, general admission is $25, check in at the computers outside the High Roller ride building, very convenient.
Turned out we didn't need fast pass at all, we went there so late, there was no lines, only very few people were going to the ride, darn!
Minus the scary parts, the views were amazing, at 550 foot tall, 360 degree sights, tourists could see the entire night views of Las Vegas, maybe even further, it was actually pretty cool.
They serve drinks at a small lounge area before getting on the ride, we bought 2 frozen drinks, 2 fireball shots and a bottle water for $48.
They take photos for tourists on the way to the ride.
It could be a fun and different experience in Vegas, a good place for a date too, of course assuming both are not scared of heights!
Ps.
Valet parking offers bottle waters, remember to ask a few.

This review is pretty easy:  Cost $35 for the view you are paying for the view and nothing else.
More or less pictures of the view.
Oh and hopefully you get in the same pod with some cool people if not that can make or break your round a bout.
So it is up to you how much is the view of Vegas worth to you.
Night is always better to me because the day time all you see is desert.

I would recommend going when the sun starts to set, the strip lights are turned on, and the moon is out.
The pods are a different experience.
Great way to view Las Vegas.

I'm barely hanging onto a 3-star for this.
I like a view of Vegas as much as anyone else, but this is a rip off.
Well, sort of.
It is on the strip - what isn't a rip off?
First off, a complaint about the articles and marketing about this place.
Many sources state "40 people can fit.
" Okay.
If you ever have to make the decision to get into one of these pods with 39 other people - avoid it.
You will enjoy nothing.
So, tickets start around $30-35 per person.
You're walked through a lengthy but pleasant series of walkways with lots of friendly staff.
There's even a concession stand inside so you can have food and drinks while you Ferris around this wheel.
Yes, I turned that into a verb.
The pods themselves are spacious (though hardly spacious enough to fit 40).
They feel sturdy, modern, and sleek.
They have seating as well as monitors all around with this guy who talks to you and tells you sarcastic and cheesy jokes.
There's also a counter for how high you are.
Funny - even when the wheel stops (which it does many times), the counter continues rising.
If the people you end up with are anything like the people I ended up with - everyone will gather at the same spot: the southwestern quarter of the pod.
It faces all the nice looking hotels (the view I took a picture of).
Any other view is just of greater Las Vegas aka nothing to stare at.
So yeah, have fun fighting over that area because nobody leaves that spot.
Maybe the bunch I was with was just inconsiderate but really I can't blame them.
It is scenic.
Ultimately, it's nice to relax in and get a view of the city but $35, fighting over the only nice spot to take pictures from, and only being 30 minutes?
I don't know.
That's tough to swallow for me.

If you are scared of heights like I am, do not ride this.
Also, I paid extra for express tickets to skip the lines.
There was no line on a Wednesday night so it was a waste to upgrade.
There isn't a lot of seating room so be prepared to stand for a half hour.
In my opinion, it is way over priced even without the upgrade.
Of course, what isn't over priced on the strip?

Really fun experience.
We finally made it over to the High Roller on a touristy Sunday afternoon and ended up getting a whole pod to ourselves.
Tickets are $25 during the day and $35 at night.
Definitely worth it for that amazing view!

Cool and very neat experience riding the High Roller wheel.
Great views of the strip & city from it.
We rode at night.
The cost was $70+ for 2 ppl.
But I say it's worth it.
Also used the outside kiosk & was able to get in fast & bypass the long line.
Also bought frozen drinks to enjoy the ride.
It's a 30 minute ride.

Fun view of the city, we had the whole thing to ourselves & the kids loved it- pretty much a private party 420 ft above the strip.
Good locals pricing.

Kinda expensive for a 30min ride but I enjoyed it.
Great views of all the lights at night.
A little scary hopping in/out of the ride.

Great views and a full wet bar inside a monster ferris wheel.
What's not to like?
We had a dozen people, not counting the bar tender and his bar, inside our capsule and had some great views while conversing and having a couple of drinks.
Great idea for a networking activity and a great time by all who attended.

If this is your first time in Vegas, or you've never had the opportunity to see the view from high up in Vegas, then this might be worth experiencing.
Otherwise, it was just...fine.
The Linq is a pretty cool place, all in all, and the High Roller is a nice enough experience.
It takes you in a "pod"- basically a large, glass enclosed room (pretty chilly, as the AC was blasting), and slowly circles so you can see some nice views of the city.
We must have hit it at just the right time- 8p on a Friday- because there was absolutely no line.
You have the opportunity to purchase overpriced beverages at a bar before entering into your pod, and you're off.
The pod plays music (it is at a low volume, it isn't a party), and facts about Vegas.
While the views are nice, it is a little on the boring side.
I could see it maybe being more exciting if it were more crowded with wild people, though!
I can't see doing this over and over, but I'm glad I can check it off the list.

I can't beleive the High Roller is bigger than the London Eye.
But, supposedly the specifications say it is.
If you're a Total Rewards member, you get a discount, or use the points to pay for this.
At night the cost is $35 to ride this, and during the day they have a different price (cheaper, I think since no one wants to see Vegas during the day) and then a multi use ticket to ride the HR during the day and night.
They suggest booking a reservation time, but on a Saturday night, no one was in line.
It was very empty.
I'm giving it 3 stars because its an A ok attraction for Vegas, but I can't pay for such an outrageous price, even if I used my Comp points.
$2 off for a Total Rewards Platinum discount also isn't enough.
Maybe a $5 discount, but $2?
Nope.
There's so much to see and do in Vegas, I'll think about riding this if I am utterly bored.

I can only give this a 4-star rating...perhaps closer to 3-1/2 stars...why you ask?
This is really just a slow motorized observation deck...and the couple you share the pod with...20 out of town vacationers who have been in the 100+ heat all day, and a couple gamblers who have been drinking since before breakfast...makes the next 30-minutes a little uncomfortable.
I did enjoy the High Roller, but for the cost I expected something a little bit different.
A little history of the making of the High Roller...I was in Shanghai China at a company called ZPMC...these are the same people who fabricate those..."Huge Container Cranes" that we see in our Ports (Los Angeles, Long Beach, Seattle, etc ) unloading those huge ships.
Their steel structures division was building the High Roller.
How awesome was it to see this underway...and the USA Engineering Firm inspecting everything...Smith Emery Company from Los Angeles and San Francisco.
Both firms are outstanding.
This is a top notch engineered marvel...you need to ride this at least once.
So why not 5-stars...  ...for $35 you can wait in a huge line, have a drink (extra $), and spend 30-minutes with 25 sweaty folks sharing the space in the pod...well, for me there isn't enough ventilation, I felt starved for oxygen.
Maybe at other times of the day it is better, or perhaps in the later evening.
When it was all said and done, for me anyway, I was satisfied in having rode the ride, but for the money I just expected something a little bit different.

This is a lot of money for a half hour view of the city.
It was supposed to be romantic but we got stuck on there with two very intoxicated people who were very loud and kept talking to us.
Ugh.
I think they need to lower the prices for sure, and as for the drunk people, I don't have a solution.
Guess that's just Vegas

So worth it!
Only $35 per person, just double fist the drinks when you get on.
There wasnt a long line and we went prime time evening hours.
They only put about 15-20 people on the pod at once, but Ive talked to people who said they were on them with less than 10.
Its 30 minutes per rotation, it goes by quicker than you think.
Views are great both day and night.

The High Roller doesn't appear to be bigger than the London Eye, and the capsule actually seems to be slightly smaller.
I had a better experience than most (from what I've read in other Yelp reviews), since my family and I rode by ourselves as part of a birthday celebration & surprise gift for my sister-in-law (her Navy husband came just for the week to surprise her & reunited with the family at the High Roller).
Our ride was at 6PM-ish, so I absolutely have to tell people, the view will most likely be more spectacular if you ride during the night.
The tickets aren't cheap, so make sure that you  ride under optimal conditions for your money!

Let me start with the negatives and why I only gave three stars:  Grossly overpriced.
Yes it is Vegas and the strip, but it's not like I have a private pod or free alcohol flowing as I boringly look out at the landscape.
Oh, wait.
I have a 'high view' with A/C blowing on me.
There's the savings!!.......not.
Also there shouldn't be day to evening costs.
Not to mention it's about 30 min.
ride roundtrip.
It's just not the best experience in town.
We did it for that 'once in a lifetime' feel and I'm happy to say I have been on it but that's about where it ends.
Save your $$ and visit the top of Stratosphere; eat dinner in the Paris eiffel tower; or just take a ride on the strip monorail.
You'll have a more enjoyable time.

Last night I went to the high roller right before they were closing to purchase the last ride at the pay station (which wasn't working), we then found a high roller store that sold the tickets who wouldn't service us because we were a couple mins late.
My family and I then came back the next afternoon, and purchased the tickets, only to find out they had technical errors.
At that point I wanted to talk to the manager about the level of service we had experienced during that time (no one cared and didn't give a $h!t).
Caroline, the manager came out and had ZERO customer service.
I explained to that we wanted to take our daughter here because we were leaving her for the summer and she's been wanting to go on this ride, we purchased drinks, took photos, but couldn't get on.
The lady looked so dumbfounded, all she could say is "you and everyone else, what do you expect?!".
I let her know she had poor customer service skills.
It's unfortunate how us customers spend money on expensive drinks, and the manager Caroline has no empathy.
She ends up leaving, storms off and says "too bad you feel that way".
Sandy was the only rep there that understood (someone else should recruit her that values people).
My husband and I were thinking about renewing our vows there, even spoke to someone about it....NOT ANYMORE!!
Get rid of Caroline, she's terrible for the business.

Definitely a must do while in Vegas but expect to feel underwhelmed when leaving.
The views during the day is flat, dry, and pretty boring.
However, it's pretty safe to assume spectacular views at night because I am always in awe when I walk the strip at night.
It was pretty slow during the day.
No lines or congested pods, just the people in my party.
My mother was deathly afraid because she was under the impression that this was a thrill ride,  it's not.
It's best described as a mobile observation deck.
The mobile observation deck lasts approximately 30 minutes so make sure you tinkle prior to entering.
And from reading other reviews, looks like you are allowed to bring drinks onboard.
I believe the cost is $25 during the day and $35 at night.
I personally would not return but you definitely have to do it once.

enjoyed the ride and the view from the top.
i think it is worth it - you can get some really cool pictures of vegas from varying angles.
i'm sure right at dusk or late evening would have beautiful views (we went mid-afternoon on a clear day so we could see pretty far out).
the only thing i would say is that it is so new, the price or deals will start popping up... if each person was ~$15-20, it would definitely be right on target - as it stands its probably $10-15 over-priced.
wait a bit and i'm sure there will be deals to be had!

Yes, it's a little on the pricey side, but opt to go during the day and the tickets are less expensive and there are fewer people.
The engineering was beautiful on this 550 ft behemoth.
You can see much of the strip and beyond (hence, go during the day) during this 30-minute ride.
They have a bar before the loading platform and you can bring drinks inside the ride.
We had two other couples with our family of four so there was plenty of room and we ended up taking pictures for each other!
The cabins are air conditioned and there's two seating areas (holds about 8 people) so you can relax, enjoy the cool reprieve, and just appreciate this great new addition to the strip!

Love it!!!
I have gone both in the daytime and at night!
The staff is so friendly, and helpful.
The views are amazing, and the pods are never crowded.
If you ate afraid of heights, don't worry!
It is a VERY smooth ride, and you don't even realize your moving.
This is a must try for everyone in LV

This is the best new attraction in Las Vegas.
It is the center piece of the revitalization in between the Flamingo and the Quad hotels, which has been called the Linq.
I won a ticket on this ferris wheel by playing black jack at Flamingo and getting a suited black jack.
I had planned on going on this anyways, but that free ticket sealed the deal.
Price of tickets are reasonable too.
My girlfriend joined me on the ride and her ticket was less than $20, because it was before 6pm.
After 6PM, the price doubles, which still isn't that bad of a price.
They also have a bar before you go on the actual ride, since it is Vegas after all.
The view is epic from over 500 feet high in the sky.
My best piece of advice is to make sure your cell phone battery is fully charged before you go on this ride, because you will be taking a lot of pictures.
The whole ride is 30 minutes long.
It feels shorter because of how much fun you are having.
I was surprised about a couple of things.
The first of which is that the ride doesn't pause for you to hop on your cart.
I could foresee some senior citizens having issues with that.
I did notice that the ride stopped on a couple occasions, so maybe they do stop it if there is someone with mobility issues.
The other problem I saw with the ride was the annoying video recording on the monitor inside  the cart.
I felt like they tried to hard with the video tour guide who wasn't that funny when he clearly was trying to be.
And the 30 second countdown to reaching the highest point of the ride was a little overboard.
Overall, this is something I would definitely do again, especially with someone who has never been on it.

This is a must-do if when you're in Las Vegas, so you can tell everyone you've been on the highest observation wheel in the world.
The high roller is offering some amazing deals right now on their website, so don't forget to check before booking.
The one that suited us best, was the $5 off for locals, and kids ride free with paid ticket.
What would typically cost us $140+ for our family of 4, came out to only $60.
That made it completely worth it.
I printed my tickets at home, but since it was low on toner, some of the barcodes didn't fully make it.
No worries, because they were able to find my reservation through my confirmation # anyway.
We chose the 8PM ride because we were there with another family and our kiddies are not night owls.
We walked right through all the lines and immediately were able to get on because there was no one ahead of us.
They were generous (smart) enough to give our party of 9 our own pod which was nice because we were able to let the kids run free inside instead of having to worry about them bothering people.
The kids LOVED it!
You go in and there's a guy who tells you about the high roller and makes "funny" jokes.
The kids' favorite part was the screen which told you how high your elevation was and being up in the air in general.
The views are spectacular, and 8pm was perfect to see the sun set into night.
I feel like we almost got a double ride.
On the way down, the music was going and the kids just turned it into their own little dance party.
It was definitely the most expensive dance party I've ever been to, but worth every penny.
If you'd like to watch the sun set on the high roller, be sure to check out weather.com or something similar that will tell you the exact time the sun sets, so you can catch day & night like us.
It's beautiful.

LOVED IT!!
We opted to make an 8:30pm reservation and it was perfect!
Saturday night, not crowded, beautiful evening lights of the Strip....the wheel itself gives no sensation of motion, the view is up and out, not down, down, down like tower-type observation attractions, so I think even folks uncomfortable with heights would not be put off.
Each pod is air conditioned and roomy, although the only downside is that there isn't a lot of seating....BUT, if you're a photo nut like me, you won't sit any how!
A must-do....

A little taste of Disneyland right here in good old Las Vegas!
I think that everyone should go for a ride on the HR at least once.
I took the advice of a fellow Yelper and I went at dusk (8pm in mid June).
It made for the start of the ride being at dusk and the last part of the ride at dark.
Being able to get such an amazing view of the valley that we live in was a real treat.
Sure, many of us have arrived in town via airplane at dusk/dark, but it's not quite the same thing.
:) I would recommend buying your tickets online and print them out before you arrive to avoid the long lines.
I timed our ride and it was 35 mins- the ride did stop a few times to assist in the arrival/departure of riders with special needs.
It did get a little scary/uneasy at the very top, but upbeat music played so that helped distract me a bit.
I doubt I will take a second ride because once was enough.
But make sure to cross it off YOUR bucket list.

So the high roller was doing this fantastic father's day weekend buy one get one free if you were a dad.
My wife and I figured what the heck, let's give it a roll.
We smartly by passed the extremely long line at the entrance to the mail guest services and walked over to the automated machines where there is a smaller guest services window with a much smaller line.
With the father's day deal I also received a $10 voucher to the sky lounge to get a drink for free to take on the ride.
So once we got our tickets we pretty much walked right into the sky lounge, the bartender we had seemed to be having issues, but other than that we got our drinks and we proceeded to the Disney-like queue area (also known as the line to get on).
The main part of this includes and decently cool room with a 270 degree screen playing videos and a guy (who is your guide throughout the entire trip) making corny jokes while you wait.
It wasnt too bad.
Then you proceed to boarding, where for the most part they corral you into this fencing area like cattle before having to rush to board as it continues moving the entire time (unless there is a handicapped individual) then it stops.
You then sit down and enjoy the ride.
The view is pretty cool, and saying that I rode on the world's tallest observation wheel is also pretty cool.
So I give it a four star rating for the initial ride, but I won't ride it again to ensure I down downgrade my rating.
Oh and by the way we did not take our kids on this one.
Any kid under say 10 will probably get massively board and not enjoy this.

Had I not gotten a locals discount, this would totally be a 4 star review.
If you follow me, you know I am HUGE on local love and appreciation!
So thank you, High Roller for jumping along board!
Only 40 bucks for myself, my bf, and the daughter since luckily she's still 12!
I did not expect much.
I was raised in this city, what can this wheel show me that I have not yet seen?
Well, a view I did not know existed for one.
A shot of the Bellagio fountain show that puts a whole new aspect on it.
And to be able to fully see the entire city from east to west, north to south, was simply breathtaking.
TIPS: 1.
Go with a larger crowd, so you have the chance of getting the pod to yourself, or you and another group ONLY.
It fits 30, but I would say only 18-20 comfortably.
When you step into the pod, go for the seats on the right.
They have a better view IMO.
Take advantage of the restroom and bar before going up.
It is a 30 minute ride.
Be respectful.
If you have bratty kids who throw fits, stay at home.
If you might be too drunk, don't do it.
And BY ALL MEANS, if you are afraid of heights, SHUT UP and deal with it, or stay on the ground.
We don't all want to try to convince you to walk to the window and look down, really.
Other than that, enjoy!
There are not many places you can go in this city, and enjoy the scenery.
Especially from the strip!

We're locals, so we were really excited to finally experience the High Roller.
The line was long so we bought our tickets at the kiosk.
They cost $40 each.
As we were walking in, we noticed a sign that says locals save $5.
We mentioned that we just bought tickets and didn't get the $5 discount & the employee told us if we bought them at the kiosk, it was too late to get the discount.
He was quite rude about it.
We figured we'd deal with it after our ride & proceeded to the attraction.
There's a bar there, so we bought a couple drinks & waited in line for the ride.
The drinks were expensive, but we knew the drinks would be at this new tourist attraction.
The pods you sit in were really nice.
We were with about 10 other people, which was fine, we didn't feel overcrowded and it was easy to move within the pod.
The view was magnificent, of course.
The ride is about 30 min long.
If you're afraid of Ferris wheels, don't be afraid of this one.
It goes so slow, you don't even feel like you're moving.
When we finished the ride, we tried to see if we could get our $5 local discount.
The girl we talked to was even more rude about it than the first guy we spoke to.
She actually rolled her eyes at me.
My boyfriend then asked to speak to a manager.
She basically refused to get the manager until we continually insisted on seeing a manager.
We were then led to the manager by a different employee.
The manager quickly apologized & credited $10 to my boyfriend's credit card.
In addition to the $5 discount, she said locals 17 and under ride free.
However, we didn't see this special posted anywhere.
I'm sure lots of families would come if their kids ride free.
Why offer these discounts if they don't really advertise them?
We paid $70 for the tickets & another $25 for 2 drinks.
For $95, I'd say go to Ghostbar or the Voodoo Lounge & enjoy the same view &  enjoy more than 1 cocktail!

What a wonderful way to experience the views of Las Vegas.
Insted of walking around in circles under the heat do yourself a favor and pay the 36 bucks to see the strip in an air conditioned room .
We went on father's day and all father's were free and even received a 10 dollar credit for the bar which the hubby really appreciate since the coronas were 9 bucks a piece.
All the staff was genuinely friendly and looked happy to assist us as we wondered lost inside the very confusing building.
They had 2 different box offices and 4 kiosks(which were not working) so we were a bit confused as to where we had to go to purchase our tickets.
I'd say to avoid the lines and buy your tickets at home since once you have your tickets you go straight to the ride.
The only reason I gave it 4 stars is do to the fact that the wheel does not stop when your are boarding or when you are exiting.
It was pretty scary since we had a stroller with us and my husband had to quickly exit and pull our stroller while I jumped out with our child.
Overall it was a great experience and for those of you who are complaining about the price keep in mind this is an attraction and like any other attractions they are going to be expensive.
Nothing in Vegas is free!

We went to ride the High Roller on Tuesday, June 17th at around 11 pm.
We were stuck in the pod for about 20 minutes because the entire attraction stopped working.
We were 2 pods away from the very top.
Instead of doing a full rotation we had to go down the same way we went up.
Apparently this was the first time the high roller had stopped working.
The views were amazing, but the experience was not the best.
When we went to the customer service desk they asked if we wanted a ticket for another day or a refund.
Of course we chose the refund of $72+ for two people.

High roller was a very very beautiful experience!
You can def see all of Las Vegas.
It's the perfect length of time to go around and the capsules are very modern and unique.
I live in vegas and I would say it's a vegas must while you are on vacation here.
The thing we didn't like was that when we walked up (my boyfriend and I) we over heard the girl say on the Walkie talkie "well they aren't all over each other"... Then they made us wait for another couple to ride with us.
I thought it was strange and asked why.
They said because people have sex up there when they are alone.
And because if one person passes out or gets nervous then you need two people to attend to them (Which was the more politically correct answer) as we were getting in another two people walked in right away to their own capsule.
They were two men.
So that threw out the politically correct answer.
Over all I thought it was very rude and sexist against me and my boyfriend that they were assuming we were going to have sex up top.... Staff should figure out something about that.
Anyways it's a great one time thing but it's very expensive :) thanks

Great view.
I think experiences my vary here.
Depending on the size of the group in your bubble and depending on the attitudes of the other in your bubble as well.
We had 6 people and it was was a about right.
No one getting in anyones way and everyone was friendly.
This is a fairly nice tourtisy trap for Vegas.
The downfall on this place is the price per ticket if you are not a local.
I would not have paid full price for this ride which is 35 bucks a pop at night.
If you have the money to spend and 30 minutes to set back an relax i would recomend this.
If saving money for something better and more value is your thing than I would pass.

You know this thing was pretty cool.
Great views, but $35 a head.
I guess thats not that bad for the view, but I should have gotten an extra beer before I went up there, haha.
If it was $35 + a drink ticket or something.
Then we would be talking.

The only other "pod" Ferris Wheel I had been on before was the Millennium Wheel (I think they call it the London Eye now) back in 2004 and, despite the long line and hefty price, I was quite impressed with that ride.
Amazing views of Big Ben and the rest of London overlooking the River Thames.
So...when I found out the largest pod wheel in the world had recently been erected in Vegas...well, I had to go!
My husband and I and another couple went at around 1 something a.m. after partying on The Strip all night.
Good decision.
There was absolutely no line.
Walked right into the pod that was probably 3x the size of the one in London, with only 2 other people on board.
Off we went.
The High Roller moves soooooo slow you can't even tell you're moving.
Very smooth.
Yes, great views but actually had better views from our room at the Cosmopolitan that overlooked The Strip and the Bellagio Fountains.
If only they could have put the wheel in a different location.
Still a cool experience; however, once is enough.
At $34.95 p/p plus tax and $9 draft beers each, it's a one time must do experience in Vegas...and/or fork out another 100 bucks per person and take a helicopter tour!
Much better views and greater overall experience.
[Review for Maverick Helicopters]

I really enjoyed the experience.
I couldn't wait to get on it.
But the parking was an issue.
We found out after the fact that we should have parked in the back by the high roller and not where the casinos are located.
The next thing the price I'm a local and was shocked to find out that they don't offer locals specials.
Also I think that the price is ridiculously over priced especially at night.
The view wasn't to bad depending on the direction you are looking.
Over all it was a great experience and a good date night must do.
I also think that the kids would love it to.

A must do while in Las Vegas!
We rode in June 2014 for the first time and really enjoyed it.
Yes it's expensive...especially at night $35.
But we had no regrets!
A pleasant staff ushers you in and our wait was fairly minimal.
There is music and videos throughout the experience.
The pods are spacious and can hold 40 people but usually there is 10-20.
On ours there was maybe 20 and I was glad for that.
The views are great at all points and photo ops are plentiful.
I recommend the night ride as the city looks it's best.
The sense of movement was almost undetectable even on a windy night.
I have to say that I am painfully scared of heights...but 2 cocktails and I was willing.
There were still moments of fear but you can sit down and compose yourself.
Very glad I did it!

High Roller was cool, but glad I got a Groupon; otherwise, overpriced.
Good views, not horrible drinks, and it's something to say you've done.
Just make sure you don't get stuck in a cabin with a shrill screaming child that takes your $10 drink while irresponsible mom isn't paying attention, which was our experience.
3 stars for lack of age screening.

The High Roller is the world's tallest observation wheel with 360 degree views of the Strip and suburbs.
You share a pod with a few others for a 30 minute or so ride.
The pod has some seating so if your pod isn't too full you can sit and there are TV monitors broadcasting a recorded Host who gives information and updates throughout the ride.
You choose your time slot when you purchase your tickets so think about how you want to see the city, during the day you can see farther and with more detail, at night you get the city lights.
I wouldn't say this is a must do when in Vegas, only go if you like observation decks/wheels.
Compared to other city's observation decks/wheels, the High Roller is very well done.

Last night my family and I enjoyed a fun time on the high roller!
We bought our tickets on groupon which gave us 2 for 1 drinks, 2 for 1 photos, 15% off at the store && 2 tickets for 65$ .... What a deal.
We printed out the groupons went up to the bar got our drink, walked over to go up to the pods && we were told we had to go back down and redeem them for tickets ...
The line was so long!!!
However Lonisha, the sweetest lady ever, walked us to a small VIP area to get it done quick.
She chit chatted with us while we got out tickets and walked us back up.
They also gave us 3 additional 2 for 1 drinks which was very nice!!
The pods have plenty of room even on a busy night, the tvs around the pod show you all kinda of fun stuff to know like: how high you are, where you are on the wheel, a building time lapse && many more.
Beautiful views, especially when bellagio has the water show going.
Had a wonderful time on the high roller and we will be back!
Thankyou for the great costumer service.

The new High Roller located at The Linq is the world's tallest observation wheel that provides a 360 degree view of Las Vegas and the Strip.
Being a local, I decided that I would go ahead and try it out (mostly just to say that I have done it).
Just a little about the attraction... there are a total of 28 cabins that hold about 40 passengers each.
It's about a 30 minute ride that takes you 550 feet above the Strip.
The cost for adults is $19.95 (open till 6PM) and $34.95 (6PM till close).
We decided to go later in the evening when the views would be at their best.
Luckily when we arrived (11PM or so), there wasn't a wait and were able to purchase our tickets and board the cabin within 5 minutes.
There is a bar that you are able to stop at before boarding if you wish to take a drink with you.
If you looking to waste a bunch of money, you can also rent a private cabin for your group (approx.
$1300) or even purchase a bottle service (approx.
$1800).
Keep in mind, this is only good for once around so it's a pretty penny for only a 30 minute ride.
All in all, it was a fun experience.
We got some great pictures and the view is amazing, but I don't know if I would pay $34.95 to do it again.
It's one of those, you do it once and then never again.
I know since I've gone, they've started to offer packages, local discounts and discounts through Groupon, etc.
I would be sure to check those out before heading straight to the box office to get tickets.
A couple tips...
TIP #1: Go at night... they open at 12PM, but the views are far better if you go during the sunset or later at night.
TIP #2: I mentioned it before, but check various sites for discounts!
TIP #3: If you aren't walking there, there's a valet located off of Koval (of course it's complimentary!

The High Roller is something I would highly recommend experiencing, especially during the night.
Vegas is such a beautiful city, with all the glittering lights, sparkling hotels, and colorful buildings, that you have to take advantage of its beauty in every way possible.
The High Roller gives you yet another sky high view of all Vegas's glory and provides amazing photo opportunities.
Some hopefully helpful information: -The ride is thirty minutes long -Riders enjoy the experience standing in an enclosed observation deck, or a huge, round pod, that can fit many people in each -It is located on the east side of the strip so you'll be viewing the buildings from the east -To get to the High Roller, just look into the sky and walk towards it!
It's so huge!
But for more specific directions, it's located all the way at the end of the Linq  -In the pods there are tv screens that show you where in the ride you currently are and how high up your pod is.
There's also this guy that talks a little, provides trivia, and gives you more information about Vegas and the High Roller, providing footage on how it was made.
-Different kinds of music clips play throughout the whole ride -Like most attractions, your photo is taken before the ride which is available for purchase at the end  My biggest tip: Go on a weekday at around 1:30 am or right before it closes, whenever it is not busy.
This way, you can get the whole entire humongous pod to yourself and do not have to share it with another party!
Up in the air, you can dance the night away in your pod, act crazy, be silly, run around in circles, share a romantic moment, enjoy the views with whomever you're with, and do whatever your heart desires.
But do remember, there is a camera in there.
;) Getting a whole pod to ourselves I think really made this experience amazing.

It's one of those tourist things you have to experience at least once.
Plus its the world's biggest ferris wheel.
It's a pricey ride at $35.
Obviously, go at night to appreciate all the pretty lights of the Strip.
It's slow and doesn't feel you are moving.
I believe it travels one mile per hour.
30 minutes for one rotation.

I received my ticket through Yelp's Nerdy Bowling event for $14.95 in the nighttime, but it was a half off night anyway so there were a lot of people in line that night!!
On the regular, it's pretty expensive:  Daytime $20, Nighttime, $35  The other prices they show are not worth it, just pick a time with them and go then!
Don't spend extra just because you're late all the time!
Also, there's usually always a way to get $5 off when you buy your tix at certain locations!
The line didn't take too long, even though there was a ton of people that day.
The pods seat a lot of people and are pretty comfortable to move around in--you aren't too crowded.
There are two benches to sit inside which probably fit 8-9 people at the most.
There are TV monitors inside, which feature and provide: facts, a quiz, your height information, elevator music, and a very very enthusiastic, blonde High Roller Guide dude.
He even counts down to when you reach the top!!!
It's EPIC.
(And yes, I do mean that semi sarcastically.
) It was a little corny and odd.
I feel like they need the height information, but a new way to pull viewers to watch the TV screen from time to time.
It was pretty fun to see the views of Vegas; more specifically the view of the pod corner that faces the Luxor which is definitely more interesting than the other corners ;P It was a calming, beautiful and aesthetic 30 minutes of my life.
Definitely something I would only pay for during a sale or when family stops by Vegas on vacation or during a firework holiday!
P.S.
if you didn't grab a seat in the beginning, don't worry, the people sitting down will eventually get restless and stand up :)   Also, the color changing lights of the High Roller are beautiful, too, and a perfect photo op when walking on the Linq "street"!

My friend got me a ticket to High Roller which he got for $17.
I can count with 1 hand how many times I've been on a ferris wheel.
It's a 550ft tall observation deck.
You can go to Stratosphere if you want to be up higher...and jump off 858ft!
Going in the pod could be a little bit tricky if the people in front of you are scared, too slow or aren't alert...making the pod seem to be moving faster.
Once you're in, the wheel moves ever so slowly and it stops.
It takes 20-30 minutes to complete a whole rotation.
You can either sit or stand and enjoy the view.
I can see tourists enjoying this a lot.
I wish there was a way to have a pod with screaming kids and their guardians grouped together and those who don't have their own pod.
Otherwise, it just turns out to be a torturous and the longest 30 minutes of your life.
I'll bring Advil and earplugs next time.

I wanted to take a ride on this from the first moment I seen it.
Checked the prices online and it's was a little expensive for a 30 minute ride.
So I checked Groupon for things to do while in Vegas, and came out a winner on this.. For $65 bucks you get to ride anytime day or night, two for one drinks and a photo plus 15% off at the gift shop..
It's takes you 500 feet in the air..
This views of Vegas are breathtaking..

We loved it.
There were no lines!
We were greeted by friendly employees.
The cars were cool and not crowded.
The views were fabulous.
My son had a blast.
Free for kids under 12.
Great entertainment.

This is a very nice attraction that is definitely worth going on at least once in your life....but you don't ever need to go on it again after that.
First off, it's pricey.
Even for locals.
That right there deters me from wanting to go on it again.
It's not the most comfortable when you're in the pod.
I only had about 20 other people in the pod with me, which is about half of what it CAN hold, yet it was still difficult to move around, and I just wanted to yell, "MOVE!
You've been hogging the best spot for the whole ride!
Let someone else get a chance!
" to some people.
Also, there is a super annoying guy in the video that plays the entire time you're on the ride.
And it's true: 30 minutes is a long time when you're going a foot a second.
Once you get to the top and see the amazing view, then you're bored out of your mind for the second half as it comes down.
Again, it is worth going on at least once to experience it and see the cool sights, but that's about it.
P.S.
They need to invest in some good photo editing equipment.
In the picture my brother and I took, we both had glaring red eyes and looked like Terminators!

Awesome this is bad ass ....
Phenomenal views !!!
Great way to see it all without a helicopter ......
Reasonable price ...

"You never count your money, while you're sittin at the table.
There'll be time enough for countin, when the dealing's done.
" - "The Gambler", Kenny Rogers  Do you think you're a high roller?
Well, do ya, punk?
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#3fm-EVs3SBT7NHWxD_djXw  High Roller, the world's largest observation wheel, is located at the rear of the LINQ, between the Quad & Jimmy Buffett's Margaritaville.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#_9LTPN7u1YmKUJPOpuJtRA  Air-conditoned pods slowly move from beginning to end in 30 mins http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#L0OSF4b_uWh6nIwiRJemMg  Loading/unloading is on the move, with safety nets underneath to deter any unfortunate accidents.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#Nyt2U4sx7nHJRtbcMJ7BNg  I'm glad we weren't packed like sardines.
TV's keep passengers abreast of how many feet high they are with some funky music to keep the party atmosphere going.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#pAoz7D8Cd-KDUSRGbljfYg  A view going up http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#tKKALBtgPx50nI_r8U_Ezw  A view at the top http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#TsCGcB6yo0ge18MLx3njHQ  Fountains of Bellagio, from a distance http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#nqQ_yN7wC1IPlvKUPnZJGA  The ride was pretty smooth, with a little rocking near the top.
After about 10-15 mins, I was done & ready to go already.
Celebrity sighting!
Levar Burton, of Roots/Reading Rainbow/Star Trek:The Next Generation fame, shooting a new episode of Reading Rainbow http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#jpsyHvgquUbaXlHVtH4BHw  I'm glad I had the chance to ride the High Roller, but at $21.95 during the day & $36.95 at night, I find it to be too pricey for just a souped up ferris wheel.
I recommend the High Roller as something to take a pic of from a distance, with or w/o selfie.
http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/high-roller-las-vegas-2?select=kqAy-nV5PY-cN0jUdwc5WQ#bgzSv2jFMKPKDP3e1vu9Dw  BTW, I have a free ticket voucher for the High Roller, which expires Dec. 30, 2014.
If you're interested, I'll trade it for dinner ;)

This feat of modern engineering invites you to travel inside an air conditioned and slowly rotating sphere on the outside of a 450-foot bicycle-style wheel.
The views of the city and surrounding desertscape are spectacular and ride is incredibly slow and smooth.
We went on a weekday afternoon and had an entire cabin to ourselves!
The only negative about this amazing experience (it's currently the tallest wheel in the world!
) is the poorly written and produced media forced on you on the cabin's multiple video screens.
The video is hosted by a dorky actor with pedantic humor.
The motion graphics don't seem to consistently show where you are on the wheel or your elevation.
A dashboard-style display with audio-only announcements would have been much more effective.
The music is also kind odd - it would be great to select your music preference (and control the volume).
Two great additions would be digital binoculars that allow you to zoom in to see distant things much closer, and an augmented reality screen that names every building you see.
(There's currently no reference for anything below).
The time lapse building video was the best thing they showed.
Regardless, riding the High Roller is a new must-do experience in Vegas.
The only question is to do it by day or by night?

Nice way to see the city, especially at night.
I was a little disappointed that when you get to the very top of the wheel most of the Strip is STILL obscured by the closer hotel buildings in the foreground, but what you can see is still worth the trip up.
Try to go on a weekday so you don't have to fight other riders crowding up to the windows for the best views.
Great for kids!

You can buy tickets online or when you get there.
Around $50 each.
But they do have deals living social Groupon , through casinos....
It was amazing.
Very calm ride.
Exciting.
You see everything.
I went at night and all the lights was just magical.
Kids are free!
Picture at the end kinda pricey , not the best quality.
I had a thick stand of hair going across my face and he didn't say anything.
Just took one shot.
I guess it's good if you don't plan on buying the picture ... my dad still did but I don't like it.

Unique views of Vegas and the surrounding community.
Bought our tickets for a night run inside Harrahs.
Yes, it's pricey, but discounts are out there if price is a concern, spend the time, save some money.
We pretty much walked right through LINQ and right up to the pod.
Friendly crew all the way, friendly riders too.
Loading looks a bit hairy, but it's smooth enough if you follow the lead of the people ahead of you and heed the guidance of the crew member (the pod move along the loading dock so you're working with a moving target like an escalator, but the movement is lateral).
The lower quadrants are pretty uneventful as you get oriented.
A video host makes annoying appearances throughout the ride, sometimes bringing interesting facts, other times pumping up the excitement like only a generic videotaped pep rally can.
The timelapse constuction video is cool.
They could slow it down, or repeat it and offer it on the lower parts of the ride where the parking lot is currently the backdrop.
Various data comes and goes.
A continuous graphic showing your position and altitude would be nice.
Also, they could use the screens to help locate and identify noteworthy spots and attractions.
The views are great.
If you're not blessed with a upper floor view at your hotel or your room faces the suburbs, this is a cheap way to see what you're missing.
You can take some pretty good pictures in the pod, but be aware of the distortion in some areas where the "glass" is curved.
The ride is smooth, very few motion issues, the air is mostly fresh with comfy a/c and our pod was not overstuffed so we could all move around.
I'd walk slowly and observantly to the pod and consider your neighbors as you approach the loading zone.
If you don't want to be locked up with drunk fratboys, mobs of kids, or loud ethnic ladies screaming a foreign language endlessly into their phones........adjust your arrival time.
Our pod had about a dozen riders.
One girl was having an emotional breakdown quietly with her friend consoling her (didn't appear to be ride related).
Another girl left her drink on a rail, which fell to the floor with no way to clean it up (no cup holders, finish your stuff down stairs).
But the rest of our travel mates were pleasant and courteous and seemed to have a very positive experience.
Glad we partook.
It's by no means a thrill ride and visually its very calm and pleasant and they can easily accomdate handicapped and disabled folks.
Fun time.

I'm always up for trying new adventures especially ones that challenge my fear of heights.
I've been on a lot of these types of rides but I must say that this was the smoothest and I felt the most safe.
I went at dusk and it was cool to see how the strip changed from when I took off to when I got back down.
Plus, where else can you bring a drink on a ride like this.
Gotta check it out and cross it off your bucket list.

The experience was phenomenal.
The views at the high roller are only second to those of the helicopter rides.
The price was a bit steep, and  fairly short considering.
If you're planning to do a wedding proposal, this would be a great place to do it you can rent one unit out, or just purchase individual tickets.
The ride is about 30 minutes long.

Pros: Clean and efficient, they get you on quickly.
The LINQ area and shops are very nice.
Cons:  Price ($96 for 3 with local discount).
View honestly isn't that great, it's on the back side of the strip and frankly you see a lot of the parking lot until you're about half-way up.
Underwhelmed

1st time rider here.
Went with a small group.
Had purchased tix thru groupon.
I suggest this to save $$.
We went on Sunday night.
Lines were not long because we had pre purchased our tickets.
There was bar before the line started and one right before we boarded for those who want to indulge.
Be sure to use the bathroom otherwise you will be holding it for a really long time.
We rode it at dark to see all the lights.
It was really cool to see all the views over the strip at night.
I probably wouldn't do it again.
I am local but definitely think it's worth a visit.
The Linq area is loaded with bars and restaurants too.

We got our tickets on Groupon, which I highly suggest because regular priced tickets for the LINQ are just ridiculously high.
We came around 10 pm on a Sunday on Fourth of July weekend and it was pretty empty.
They allow drinks in the observation wheel which are available for purchase in their lounge which is on the way to the observation wheel.
They have like 8-10 seats available in each cabin so if the wheel is packed, be prepared to stand for 30 minutes.
The view is beautiful, even though you can only see half of the Strip.
You cannot see anything past the Venetian.
It barely feels like it is even moving so for those of you scared of heights and whatever else, don't be.
The windows in each cabin are beyond dirty so taking pictures is kind of a waste, but possible.
Tip: The wheel stays in operation even when it rains.
Overall I'm glad I got to go on the highest observation wheel in the world, but I won't be back.
This is kind of a once in a lifetime experience so I highly suggest everyone does it once.

So fun.
First of all go at night.
Second of all buy discount tickets on Groupon or LivingSocial.
Third it's air-conditioned which is an incredible bonus fourth it's not scary at all except for stepping on and stepping off which gets a little dicey the rest of it though phenomenal view of the city

it's A-OK coz it is very expensive..
I feel like I need to get better than that with the ticket price.. but the customer service is nice.. looks safe.. all the things and built are new and secure.. Views on top aren't that amazing..(this is just for me).
overall it's really an A-OK.. you literally express it like that after the trip.

The High Roller was really fun!
I wouldn't pay full price, but I got a two-for-one flex pass deal on Groupon with buy one get one free drinks, prints, and a discount in the store.
The total ride is about 30 minutes long.
It's incredibly smooth and you really don't feel the cabin moving.
They kind of pack you in there when it's busy, so I tried to go on a less busy time, but of course at night.
Even if you're afraid of heights, I think you'd be ok in this because you really feel as if you are on an observation deck and not in an observation wheel.
It's one of those things that when you visit Vegas, you should do at least once.
Beautiful view, the staff were very friendly, and I would suggest to anyone.
But, again, at a discount.
$45/ticket is way too much for a 30 minute ride.
If you want a free, pretty view, you can always go to the Mandarin Oriental Mandarin Bar and look out the panoramic windows on the 23rd floor.

My wife and I were in Vegas this past weekend and wanted to try out the new High Roller to see what it's about.
The whole area is new-ish.
I'm not sure when it opened up but this was our first time here.
The Linq has a lot of restaurants, bars and food shops in the area.
We went with my parents as well.
On the way to the High Roller, we saw they had kiosks to buy tickets closer to the strip.
So we just decided to buy our tickets there to make it faster.
We didn't know it at the time, but this saved us a lot of time!
When you buy your tickets through the kiosk, you get to pick a time slot of when you want to ride the High Roller.
I would suggest giving yourself 20 minutes because it is still a pretty far walk just to get to the High Roller entrance and giving yourself some bathroom time.
The walkway to the High Roller entrance is where all the shops and restaurants are.
There's a lot of music being played in the area.
It seems like a really busy place and is a nice place just to stop by and chill.
When we got to the High Roller entrance, we saw a long line.
Luckily we bought our tickets through the machine and we got to walk right through!
So just a tip, purchase your tickets through the kiosk to save yourself some time.
When you walk in the workers check purses/bags.
Then you walk through the place.
It reminds me of disneyland because of the way the lines are setup.
We went on a Saturday at 9:10PM.
We got really lucky cause we got to walk right through all the way to the top without waiting in any lines.
They have an area to use the bathroom and buy drinks.
I would suggest to use the bathroom since the ride is 30 minutes long and there's no place to go when you're in the pod.
The drinks aren't that expensive.
My wife and I tried the frozen drinks with some shots of alch.
You get grouped with around 20 people.
The pods move continuously so you have to enter and exit pretty carefully.
The pods have TVs inside that tells you how high you are and when you reach the apex of the ride.
It also shows trivia and how the High Roller was made in a time lapse video.
The views pretty nice, especially at night!
You get to see the strip lit up.
It was a super full moon that night as well.
We got to see the Bellagio water show for a bit too.
The pod has two seating areas.
I would say the best place to go to in the pod would be the right side next to the entrance doors when you walk in.
It has the best view of the strip when you reach the top.
So try to make it out to that area if you can.
But pretty much you can walk around the whole pod and enjoy all the views.
I would definitely recommend taking a ride on the High Roller if you're in Vegas.
You can ride it during the day but try to go at night as you get to see all the lights Vegas has to offer.
It was $35/person at night and cheaper during the day.
Not that bad for a really good and fun experience.

Solid 3.5 stars only if you got the good Groupon deal, 2 tickets for $65 plus 2 free drinks if you were as savvy as us to get the free passes from the Quad security as we were asking directions to this 'ferris wheel' lol.
but being dehyrdated for most of the day, we asked for bottled water instead of beer or magaritas, probably a waste, but a bonus that it was Fiji water, hey it's Vegas...and I digress...
Initially not a big thing for me to do since it's such a touristy thing, and seen all the lights at night as they don't really change, but it's a thing to do, and for a 30-minute excursion, it's not going to take a big chunk of my day.
Impressed by how the staff worker just let 6 ppl per booth, to give lots of space and some privacy, even at 11pm at night.
Still quite steady amount of tourists still lining up.
542 feet is the peak, just fyi.

There are a few places on the strip that are a must do, and I think this should be added to the list.
A bunch of people are complaining about the price, but I think that $35 for a half hour ride around is not that bad of a deal.
I've gone twice now, and with the coupons and locals discounts I've never paid full price.
I've never had to wait either, which is very nice.
I guess it's not great for business that I've never had to wait, but at least I was there!
I would suggest going around sunset so that you get a great view on the way up!

My family and I experienced the ride last weekend while in town.
It's kinda neat at night to ride if your not looking for high speed and thrills.
Very scenic at the top, kinda one of those things you can check off your list that you did it.
The only complaint it's a little pricy.

Pretty neat addition to the Las Vegas strip.
The high roller takes you up 550 feet to view the Las Vegas skyline in an air conditioned cabin.
Don't worry...there are plenty of places to buy a drink before you go on your 30-minute journey.
Each cabin holds about 35-40 people and it costs about $20 during the day and $35 at night.

Great views of the strip, I loved it.
But to me overpriced.
$34.95 a ticket at night.
We did the family pack for $79.95 for 4.

